third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/bg_BG.aff
SFX Z Y 127
SFX Z   а         ат        а
SFX Z   а         е         а
SFX Z   а         ели       а
SFX Z   а         елите     а
SFX Z   а         елия      а
SFX Z   а         елият     а
SFX Z   а         ем        а
SFX Z   а         ени       а
SFX Z   а         ените     а
SFX Z   а         ете       а
SFX Z   а         еш        а
SFX Z   а         еше       а
SFX Z   а         и         а
SFX Z   а         я         а
SFX Z   а         ял        а
SFX Z   а         яла       а
SFX Z   а         ялата     а
SFX Z   а         яло       а
SFX Z   а         ялото     а
SFX Z   а         ян        а
SFX Z   а         яна       а
SFX Z   а         яната     а
SFX Z   а         яния      а
SFX Z   а         яният     а
SFX Z   а         яно       а
SFX Z   а         яното     а
SFX Z   а         ях        а
SFX Z   а         яха       а
SFX Z   а         яхме      а
SFX Z   а         яхте      а
SFX Z   м         дат       м
SFX Z   м         де        м
SFX Z   м         дейки     м
SFX Z   м         дели      м
SFX Z   м         делите    м
SFX Z   м         дем       м
SFX Z   м         ден       м
SFX Z   м         дена      м
SFX Z   м         дената    м
SFX Z   м         дени      м
SFX Z   м         дените    м
SFX Z   м         дения     м
SFX Z   м         деният    м
SFX Z   м         дено      м
SFX Z   м         деното    м
SFX Z   м         дете      м
SFX Z   м         деш       м
SFX Z   м         деше      м
SFX Z   м         дещ       м
SFX Z   м         деща      м
SFX Z   м         дещата    м
SFX Z   м         дещи      м
SFX Z   м         дещите    м
SFX Z   м         дещия     м
SFX Z   м         дещият    м
SFX Z   м         дещо      м
SFX Z   м         дещото    м
SFX Z   м         дох       м
SFX Z   м         доха      м
SFX Z   м         дохме     м
SFX Z   м         дохте     м
SFX Z   м         дял       м
SFX Z   м         дяла      м
SFX Z   м         дялата    м
SFX Z   м         дялия     м
SFX Z   м         дялият    м
SFX Z   м         дяло      м
SFX Z   м         дялото    м
SFX Z   м         дях       м
SFX Z   м         дяха      м
SFX Z   м         дяхме     м
SFX Z   м         дяхте     м
SFX Z   м         ж         м
SFX Z   м         жте       м
SFX Z   м         л         м
SFX Z   м         ла        м
SFX Z   м         лата      м
SFX Z   м         ли        м
SFX Z   м         лите      м
SFX Z   м         лия       м
SFX Z   м         лият      м
SFX Z   м         ло        м
SFX Z   м         лото      м
SFX Z   я         е         я
SFX Z   я         ейки      я
SFX Z   я         ел        я
SFX Z   я         ела       я
SFX Z   я         елата     я
SFX Z   я         ели       я
SFX Z   я         елите     я
SFX Z   я         елия      я
SFX Z   я         елият     я
SFX Z   я         ело       я
SFX Z   я         елото     я
SFX Z   я         ем        я
SFX Z   я         ете       я
SFX Z   я         ех        я
SFX Z   я         еха       я
SFX Z   я         ехме      я
SFX Z   я         ехте      я
SFX Z   я         еш        я
SFX Z   я         еше       я
SFX Z   я         ещ        я
SFX Z   я         еща       я
SFX Z   я         ещата     я
SFX Z   я         ещи       я
SFX Z   я         ещите     я
SFX Z   я         ещия      я
SFX Z   я         ещият     я
SFX Z   я         ещо       я
SFX Z   я         ещото     я
SFX Z   я         й         я
SFX Z   я         йте       я
SFX Z   я         ял        я
SFX Z   я         яла       я
SFX Z   я         ялата     я
SFX Z   я         яли       я
SFX Z   я         ялите     я
SFX Z   я         ялия      я
SFX Z   я         ялият     я
SFX Z   я         яло       я
SFX Z   я         ялото     я
SFX Z   я         ят        я
SFX Z   я         ях        я
SFX Z   я         яха       я
SFX Z   я         яхме      я
SFX Z   я         яхте      я


MAP 18
MAP аъь
MAP еи
MAP оу
MAP бп
MAP вф
MAP гк
MAP дт
MAP жш
MAP зс
MAP АЪЬ
MAP ЕИ
MAP ОУ
MAP БП
MAP ВФ
MAP ГК
MAP ДТ
MAP ЖШ
MAP ЗС
